Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.003

Title application—Health benefit exchange.

Except for chapters 41.05 and 41.40 RCW, this title does not apply to any position in or employee of the Washington health benefit exchange established in chapter 43.71 RCW.

[ 2012 c 87 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 87 ss 4, 16, 18, and 19-23: See note following RCW 43.71.030.

Spiritual care services—2012 c 87: See RCW 43.71.901.